New York, session 2025-2026, A1678.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 27-e of the labor law, as added by a chapter of the 2 laws of 2024 amending the labor law relating to requiring retail worker 3 employers to develop and implement programs to prevent workplace 4 violence, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8358-C and A. 5 8947-C, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 27-e. Prevention of retail workplace violence. 1. Definitions. For 7 the purposes of this section: 8 a. "Employer" means any person, entity, business, corporation, part- 9 nership, limited liability company, or an association employing at least 10 ten retail employees. The term shall not include the state, any poli- 11 tical subdivision of the state, a public authority, or any other govern- 12 mental agency or instrumentality. 13 b. "Retail employee" means an employee working at a retail store for 14 an employer. 15 c. "Workplace" means any location away from an employee's domicile, 16 permanent or temporary, where an employee performs any work-related duty 17 in the course of their employment by an employer. 18 d. "Retail store" means a store that sells consumer commodities at 19 retail and which is not primarily engaged in the sale of food for 20 consumption on the premises. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02670-01-5 A. 1678 2 1 [e. "Panic button" means a physical button that when pressed imme- 2 diately contacts the local 9-1-1 public safety answering point ("PSAP"), 3 provides that PSAP with employee location information, and dispatches 4 local law enforcement to the workplace. A panic button may be a button 5 that is installed in an easily accessible location in the workplace, or 6 a wearable or mobile phone-based button.] 7 2. Written workplace violence prevention policy. The department shall 8 create and publish a model retail workplace violence prevention guidance 9 document and retail workplace violence prevention policy that employers 10 may utilize in their adoption of a retail workplace violence prevention 11 policy required by this section. Such model retail workplace violence 12 prevention policy shall be publicly available and posted on the website 13 of the department. 14 a. Such model retail workplace violence prevention policy shall: 15 (i) outline a list of factors or situations in the workplace that 16 might place retail employees at risk of workplace violence, including 17 but not limited to: 18 (A) working late night or early morning hours; 19 (B) exchanging money with the public; 20 (C) working alone or in small numbers; and 21 (D) uncontrolled access to the workplace[.]; 22 (ii) outline methods that employers may use to prevent incidents of 23 workplace violence, including but not limited to establishing and imple- 24 menting reporting systems for incidents of workplace violence; 25 (iii) include information concerning the federal and state statutory 26 provisions concerning violence against retail workers and remedies 27 available to victims of violence in the workplace and a statement that 28 there may be applicable local laws; and 29 (iv) clearly state that retaliation against individuals who complain 30 of workplace violence or the presence of factors or situations in the 31 workplace that might place retail employees at risk of workplace 32 violence, or who testify or assist in any proceeding under the law is 33 unlawful. 34 b. Every employer shall adopt the model retail workplace violence 35 prevention policy promulgated pursuant to this subdivision, or establish 36 a workplace violence prevention policy that equals or exceeds the mini- 37 mum standards provided by such model retail workplace violence 38 prevention policy. Such retail workplace violence prevention policy 39 shall be provided to all employees in writing upon hire and annually 40 thereafter pursuant to paragraph a of subdivision four of this section. 41 3. Employee information and training. a. The department, in consulta- 42 tion with relevant groups as deemed necessary by the department, shall 43 produce a model workplace violence prevention training program. Every 44 employer shall utilize the model workplace violence prevention training 45 program pursuant to this subdivision or establish a workplace violence 46 prevention training program that equals or exceeds the minimum standards 47 provided by such model training program. The department's model training 48 program shall be interactive and shall include, but not be limited to: 49 (i) information on the requirements of this section; 50 (ii) examples of measures retail employees can use to protect them- 51 selves when faced with workplace violence from customers or other 52 coworkers; 53 (iii) de-escalation tactics; 54 (iv) active shooter drills; 55 (v) emergency procedures; and A. 1678 3 1 (vi) instruction on the use of security alarms[, panic] or buttons, 2 and other related emergency devices. 3 b. The department shall include information in such model workplace 4 violence prevention training program addressing conduct by supervisors 5 and any additional responsibilities for such supervisors, including 6 ways to address workplace specific emergency procedures, and training on 7 areas of previous security problems. 8 c. As part of this training, every employer shall communicate to each 9 employee a site-specific list of emergency exits and meeting places in 10 case of emergency. Such workplace violence prevention training shall be 11 provided to all retail employees upon hire and on an annual basis ther- 12 eafter. Employers covered under this section employing fewer than fifty 13 retail employees shall provide such workplace violence prevention train- 14 ing upon hire and once every two years thereafter. 15 4. Notice of policy. a. Every employer shall provide their retail 16 employees, in writing in English and in the language identified by each 17 employee as the primary language of such employee, at the time of hiring 18 and at every annual workplace violence prevention training provided 19 pursuant to subdivision three of this section, a notice containing such 20 employer's retail workplace violence prevention policy and the informa- 21 tion presented at such employer's workplace violence prevention training 22 program. 23 b. The commissioner shall prepare templates of the model retail work- 24 place violence prevention policy created and published pursuant to 25 subdivision two of this section and the model workplace violence 26 prevention training program produced pursuant to subdivision three of 27 this section. The commissioner shall determine, in their discretion, 28 which languages to provide in addition to English, based on the [size of 29 the New York state population that speaks each language and any other 30 factor that the commissioner shall deem relevant. All such templates 31 shall be made available to employers in such manner as determined by the 32 commissioner] twelve most common non-English languages spoken by limit- 33 ed-English proficient individuals in the state, based on the data in the 34 most recent American Community Survey published by the United States 35 Census Bureau and published online by the New York state office of 36 language access. 37 c. When an employee identifies as their primary language a language 38 for which a template is not available from the commissioner, the employ- 39 er shall comply with this subdivision by providing that employee an 40 English-language notice. 41 d. An employer shall not be penalized for errors or omissions in the 42 non-English portions of any notice provided by the commissioner. 43 5. [Panic buttons] Retail worker requests for assistance. a. Every 44 employer of five hundred or more retail employees [nationwide] statewide 45 shall provide [access to panic buttons throughout the workplace or work- 46 places; provided, however, if an employer chooses to utilize wearable or 47 mobile phone-based panic buttons, such employer shall be required to 48 provide such panic buttons to each of such employer's retail employees] 49 every retail employee with a silent response button to request immediate 50 assistance from a security officer, manager, or supervisor while the 51 employee is working at the employee's location in case of an emergency. 52 Such silent response button may be a device that is installed in an 53 easily accessible location in the workplace, or a wearable or mobile 54 phone-based button. 55 b. Mobile phone-based [panic] silent response buttons may only be 56 installed on employer-provided equipment, and wearable and mobile phone- A. 1678 4 1 based [panic] silent response buttons shall not be used to track employ- 2 ee locations except when the [panic] silent response button is trig- 3 gered. 4 6. Rules and regulations. The commissioner [shall] may adopt rules and 5 regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 6 7. Evaluation of policy. Beginning in the year two thousand twenty- 7 seven and every succeeding four years thereafter, the department shall 8 evaluate, using the criteria within this section, the impact of the 9 current model retail workplace violence prevention guidance document and 10 retail workplace violence prevention policy. Upon the completion of each 11 evaluation the department shall update the model retail workplace 12 violence prevention guidance document and retail workplace violence 13 prevention policy as needed. 14 § 2. Section 3 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the labor law 15 relating to requiring retail worker employers to develop and implement 16 programs to prevent workplace violence, as proposed in legislative bills 17 numbers S. 8358-C and A. 8947-C, is amended to read as follows: 18 § 3. This act shall take effect on the [one hundred eightieth] two 19 hundred seventieth day after it shall have become a law; provided that 20 subdivision 5 of section 27-e of the labor law, as added by section two 21 this act, shall take effect January 1, 2027. Effective immediately, the 22 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 23 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 24 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 26 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 27 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the labor law 28 relating to requiring retail worker employers to develop and implement 29 programs to prevent workplace violence, as proposed in legislative bills 30 numbers S. 8358-C and A. 8947-C, takes effect.